Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑12] Judicial relief. (a)
The following persons may petition a court to construe a power of attorney or
review the agent's conduct, and grant appropriate relief:

(1) The principal or the agent;

(2) A guardian, conservator, or other fiduciary acting
for the principal;

(3) A person authorized to make health care decisions
for the principal;

(4) The principal's spouse, parent, or descendant;

(5) An individual who would qualify as a presumptive
heir of the principal;

(6) A person named as a beneficiary to receive any
property, benefit, or contractual right on the principal's death or as a
beneficiary of a trust created by or for the principal that has a financial
interest in the principal's estate;

(7) A governmental agency having regulatory authority
to protect the welfare of the principal;

(8) The principal's caregiver or another person that
demonstrates sufficient interest in the principal's welfare; and

(9) A person asked to accept the power of attorney.

(b) Upon motion by the principal, the court
shall dismiss a petition filed under this section, unless the court finds that
the principal lacks capacity to revoke the agent's authority or the power of
attorney. [L 2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next